apertium-id-ms.id.metadix
    <pardef n="pembetulan/__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- peN-an variations -->
    <pardef n="pemercontohan/__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="per"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="per"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="per"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="per"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pemberlakuan/__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="penertawaan/__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>    
    <pardef n="pemerataan/__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="per"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="per"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="per"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="per"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- pe-an -->
    <pardef n="pejajaran/__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pe-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pe-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pe-an"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pe-an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pegadaian/__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe-an"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe-an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pedalaman/__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe-an"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe-an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- per-an -->
    <pardef n="perbahasaan/__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="per-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="per-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="per-an"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="per-an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="permainan/__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per-an"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per-an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perkhidmatan/__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per-an"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per-an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="absen/__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="red"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="baca/__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="red"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>    
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>an</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>annya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>an-<prm/>an</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>an-<prm/>annya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- meN- (V -> V) -->
    <pardef n="mengabsen/__vblex">
    <e c="meN-">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengarung/i__vblex">
    <e c="meN-i">
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="boros"><p><l>pemborosan</l><r>boros</r></p><par n="pembetulan/__adj" prm="pemborosan"/></e>
    <e lm="dewasa"><p><l>pendewasaan</l><r>dewasa</r></p><par n="pembetulan/__adj" prm="pendewasaan"/></e>
    <e lm="hormat"><p><l>penghormatan</l><r>hormat</r></p><par n="pembetulan/__adj" prm="penghormatan"/></e>
    <e lm="contoh"><p><l>pemercontohan</l><r>contoh</r></p><par n="pemercontohan/__n" prm="pemercontohan"/></e>
    <e lm="raga"><p><l>pemeragaan</l><r>raga</r></p><par n="pemercontohan/__n" prm="pemeragaan"/></e>
    <e lm="henti"><p><l>pemberhentian</l><r>henti</r></p><par n="pemberlakuan/__n" prm="pemberhentian"/></e>
    <e lm="laku"><p><l>pemberlakuan</l><r>laku</r></p><par n="pemberlakuan/__n" prm="pemberlakuan"/></e>
    <e lm="tawa"><p><l>penertawaan</l><r>tawa</r></p><par n="penertawaan/__n" prm="penertawaan"/></e>
    <e lm="panjang"><p><l>pemerpanjangan</l><r>panjang</r></p><par n="pemerataan/__adj" prm="pemerpanjangan"/></e>
    <e lm="rata"><p><l>pemerataan</l><r>rata</r></p><par n="pemerataan/__adj" prm="pemerataan"/></e>
    <e lm="lembaga"><p><l>pelembagaan</l><r>lembaga</r></p><par n="pejajaran/__n" prm="pelembagaan"/></e>
    <e lm="mafia"><p><l>pemafiaan</l><r>mafia</r></p><par n="pejajaran/__n" prm="pemafiaan"/></e>
    <e lm="wayang"><p><l>pewayangan</l><r>wayang</r></p><par n="pejajaran/__n" prm="pewayangan"/></e>
    <e lm="latih"><p><l>pelatihan</l><r>latih</r></p><par n="pegadaian/__vblex" prm="pelatihan"/></e>
    <e lm="lindung"><p><l>pelindungan</l><r>lindung</r></p><par n="pegadaian/__vblex" prm="pelindungan"/></e>
    <e lm="murtad"><p><l>pemurtadan</l><r>murtad</r></p><par n="pegadaian/__vblex" prm="pemurtadan"/></e>
    <e lm="layu"><p><l>pelayuan</l><r>layu</r></p><par n="pedalaman/__adj" prm="pelayuan"/></e>
    <e lm="lestari"><p><l>pelestarian</l><r>lestari</r></p><par n="pedalaman/__adj" prm="pelestarian"/></e>
    <e lm="nonaktif"><p><l>penonaktifan</l><r>nonaktif</r></p><par n="pedalaman/__adj" prm="penonaktifan"/></e>
    <e lm="gabung"><p><l>pergabungan</l><r>gabung</r></p><par n="perbahasaan/__n" prm="pergabungan"/></e>
    <e lm="kira"><p><l>perkiraan</l><r>kira</r></p><par n="perbahasaan/__n" prm="perkiraan"/></e>
    <e lm="teman"><p><l>pertemanan</l><r>teman</r></p><par n="perbahasaan/__n" prm="pertemanan"/></e>
    <e lm="kawin"><p><l>perkawinan</l><r>kawin</r></p><par n="permainan/__vblex" prm="perkawinan"/></e>
    <e lm="rendam"><p><l>perendaman</l><r>rendam</r></p><par n="permainan/__vblex" prm="perendaman"/></e>
    <e lm="toleh"><p><l>pertolehan</l><r>toleh</r></p><par n="permainan/__vblex" prm="pertolehan"/></e>
    <e lm="cinta"><p><l>percintaan</l><r>cinta</r></p><par n="perkhidmatan/__adj" prm="percintaan"/></e>
    <e lm="lengkap"><p><l>perlengkapan</l><r>lengkap</r></p><par n="perkhidmatan/__adj" prm="perlengkapan"/></e>
    <e lm="timbang"><p><l>pertimbangan</l><r>timbang</r></p><par n="perkhidmatan/__adj" prm="pertimbangan"/></e>
    <e lm="gelimpang"><i>gelimpang</i><par n="absen/__vblex" prm="gelimpang"/></e>
    <e lm="kolaps"><i>kolaps</i><par n="absen/__vblex" prm="kolaps"/></e>
    <e lm="siam"><i>siam</i><par n="absen/__vblex" prm="siam"/></e>
    <e lm="halang"><i>halang</i><par n="baca/__vblex" prm="halang"/></e>
    <e lm="pangku"><i>pangku</i><par n="baca/__vblex" prm="pangku"/></e>
    <e lm="tangkap"><i>tangkap</i><par n="baca/__vblex" prm="tangkap"/></e>
    <e lm="dompleng"><p><l>mendompleng</l><r>dompleng</r></p><par n="mengabsen/__vblex" prm="dompleng"/></e>
    <e lm="jambret"><p><l>menjambret</l><r>jambret</r></p><par n="mengabsen/__vblex" prm="jambret"/></e>
    <e lm="saba"><p><l>menyaba</l><r>saba</r></p><par n="mengabsen/__vblex" prm="nyaba"/></e>
    <e lm="jajak"><p><l>menjajak</l><r>jajak</r></p><par n="mengarung/i__vblex" prm="jajak"/></e>
    <e lm="mungkir"><p><l>memungkir</l><r>mungkir</r></p><par n="mengarung/i__vblex" prm="mungkir"/></e>
    <e lm="telusur"><p><l>menelusur</l><r>telusur</r></p><par n="mengarung/i__vblex" prm="nelusur"/></e>
